Colorado statutes. TITLE 34 Mineral Resources
ARTICLE 32.5 COLORADO LAND RECLAMATION ACT FOR THE EXTRACTION OF CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS
34-32.5-113. Exploration notice - reclamation requirements.

A person desiring to conduct exploration shall, prior to entry upon the lands, file with the board a notice of intent to conduct exploration operations on a form approved by the board. Such notice shall be accompanied by the fee specified in section 34-32.5-125.

The notice shall contain:

The name of the person or organization doing the exploration;

A statement that exploration will be conducted pursuant to the terms and conditions listed on the approved form;

A brief description of the type of operations that will be undertaken;

A description of the lands to be explored, by township and range;

An approximate date of commencement of operations; and

A description of the measures to be taken to reclaim affected lands, consistent with section 34-32.5-116.

All information provided to the board in a notice of intent to conduct exploration shall be protected as confidential information by the board and shall not be a matter of public record In the absence of a written release from the operator.

Upon filing a notice of intent to conduct exploration, the applicant shall provide a financial warranty in an amount determined by the office.

An applicant may submit statewide warranties for exploration if such warranties are in an amount fixed by the board by rule and such person otherwise complies with this section for every area to be explored.

Upon completion of the exploration, there shall be filed with the board a notice of completion of exploration operations. Reclamation shall be completed according to section 34-32.5-116 and the approved notice of intent.

All drill holes sunk for the purpose of exploring for locatable or leasable minerals on any land within the state of Colorado shall be plugged, sealed, or capped pursuant to this subsection (6) by the person conducting the exploration. This subsection (6) shall not apply to holes drilled in conjunction with a mining operation for which the board has issued a permit nor to wells or holes regulated pursuant to section 34-33-117 and to article 60 of this title or article 80, 90, 91, or 92 of title 37, C.R.S.

Drill holes sunk for exploration purposes shall be abandoned in the following manner:

Any artesian flow of groundwater to the surface shall be eliminated by a plug made of cement or similar material or by a procedure sufficient to prevent such flow.

Drill holes that encounter an aquifer in volcanic or sedimentary rock shall be sealed using a sealing procedure that is adequate to prevent fluid communication between aquifers.

For purposes of this subparagraph (II), "aquifer" shall have the same meaning as set forth in section 37-90-103 (2), C.R.S.

Each drill hole shall be securely capped at a minimum depth that is compatible with local cultivation practices or at a minimum of two feet below either the original land surface or the collar of the hole, whichever is lower. The cap shall be made of concrete or other material which is satisfactory for such capping and the site shall be backfilled above the cap to the original land surface.

If a drill hole is to be ultimately used as or converted to a water well, the user shall comply with the applicable provisions of title 37, C.R.S.

Each drill site shall be reclaimed pursuant to section 34-32.5-116, including, if necessary, reseeding if grass or a crop was destroyed.

Abandonment in the manner provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection (7) shall occur immediately following the drilling of the hole and the probing for construction materials in the exploration process; except that a drill hole may be maintained as temporarily abandoned without being plugged, sealed, or capped. However, no drill hole that is to be temporarily abandoned without being plugged, sealed, or capped shall be left in such a condition as to allow fluid communication between aquifers. Such temporarily abandoned drill holes shall be securely covered in a manner that will prevent injury to persons and animals.

No later than sixty days after the completion of the abandonment of a drill hole that has artesian flow at the surface, the person conducting the exploration shall submit to the head of the office a report containing the location of such hole to within two hundred feet of its actual location, the estimated rate of flow of such artesian flow, if known, and a description of the technique used to plug such drill hole. Such report shall be confidential and shall not be a matter of public record.

No later than twelve months after the completion of the abandonment of a drill hole, the person conducting the exploration shall file with the head of the office a report containing the location of the hole to the nearest forty-acre legal subdivision and the facts of the technique used to plug, seal, or cap the hole. Such report and the information in such report shall be confidential and shall not be a matter of public record.

The head of the office may waive, upon written application filed with the director, any of the administrative provisions of this subsection (7) that pertain to aquifers.

The board shall inspect explored lands within ninety days after receiving notification from the person exploring the lands that reclamation has been completed. If the board finds the reclamation satisfactory, it shall release all applicable performance and financial warranties. The financial warranty shall not be held for more than sixty days after satisfactory completion.

The board and the office are authorized to inspect any ongoing exploration operation or any exploration operation prior to the request for release of performance and financial warranties in order to determine compliance with this article.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1169, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-114. Protests - petition for hearing.

An aggrieved person has the right to file written objections to and any person has the right to file written statements in support of an application for a permit and to petition for a hearing. Such protests or petitions for a hearing shall be filed with the board or office not more than twenty days after the date of last publication of notice made pursuant to section 34-32.5-112 (9). For good cause shown in such protest or petition documents, the board may, in its discretion, hold a hearing pursuant to section 34-32.5-115 to determine whether the permit should be granted. The applicant shall be notified within ten days after any objections are filed with respect to the application and shall be supplied with a copy of the written objections.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1171, § 1, effective July 1.

34-32.5-115. Action by board - appeals.

Upon receipt of an application for a permit and all fees due from the operator, the board or the office shall set a date for the consideration of such application not more than ninety days after the date of filing. At that time, the board or the office shall approve or deny the application or, for good cause shown, refer the application for a hearing to determine whether a permit should be granted.

Prior to holding a hearing, the board or the office shall provide notice to any person who filed a protest or petition for a hearing or statement in support of an application pursuant to section 34-32.5-114. Notice of the time, date, and location of the hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the locality of the proposed mining operation once a week for the two consecutive weeks immediately preceding the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S. A final decision on the application shall be made within one hundred twenty days after the receipt of the application. In the event of complex applications, serious unforeseen circumstances, or significant snow cover on the affected land that prevents a necessary on-site inspection, the board may reasonably extend the time in which a final decision must be made by sixty days.

If action upon an application is not completed within the period specified in subsection (2) of this section, the permit shall be considered to be approved and shall be promptly issued upon presentation by the applicant of a financial warranty in the amount of two thousand dollars per acre affected or such other amount as determined by the board.

In the determination of whether the board or the office shall grant a permit to an operator, the applicant must comply with the requirements of this article and section 24-4-105 (7), C.R.S. The board or office shall not deny a permit except on one or more of the following grounds:

The application is incomplete and the performance and financial warranties have not been provided.

The applicant has not paid the required fee.

Any part of the proposed mining operation, the reclamation program, or the proposed future use is contrary to the laws or regulations of this article.

The proposed mining operation, the reclamation program, or the proposed future use is contrary to the laws or regulations of this state or the United States, including but not limited to all federal, state, and local permits, licenses, and approvals, as applicable to the specific operation.

The mining operation will adversely affect the stability of any significant, valuable, and permanent manmade structures located within two hundred feet of the affected land; except that the permit shall not be denied on this basis where there is an agreement between the operator and the persons having an interest in the structure that damage to the structure is to be compensated for by the operator or, where such an agreement cannot be reached, the applicant provides an appropriate engineering evaluation that demonstrates that such structures shall not be damaged by proposed construction materials excavation operations.

The mining operation is located upon lands:

Where mining operations are prohibited by law or regulation within the boundaries of units of the national park system, the national wildlife refuge system, the national system of trails, the national wilderness preservation system, the wild and scenic rivers system, or national recreation areas;

Which are within or without the boundaries of, and are owned, leased, or have been developed by, any recreational facility established pursuant to article 7 of title 29, C.R.S., unless otherwise authorized by the appropriate governing body or unless the operation will not create any surface disturbance therein;

Which are within the boundaries of, and are owned, leased, or have been developed by, any park and recreation district established pursuant to article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., unless otherwise authorized by the board of directors of the district or unless the operation will not create any surface disturbance therein; and

Which are within the boundaries of any unit of the state park system or any state recreational area in which the entire fee estate is owned by the state of Colorado, unless the mining operation is approved jointly by the board, by the governor, and by the parks and wildlife commission or unless the operation will not create any surface disturbance therein.

The proposed reclamation plan does not conform to the requirements of section 34-32.5-116.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1172, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(4)(f)(IV) amended, (HB 12-1317), ch. 248, p. 1234, § 88, effective June 4.

34-32.5-116. Duties of operators - reclamation plans.

Every operator to whom a permit is issued pursuant to this article shall perform the reclamation prescribed by the reclamation plan adopted pursuant to this section.

Reclamation plans shall be based upon provisions for, or satisfactory explanation of, all general requirements for the type of reclamation chosen. The details of the plan shall be appropriate to the type of reclamation necessary to achieve the proposed postmining land use.

Each year, on the anniversary date of the permit, an operator shall submit the annual fee specified in section 34-32.5-125, a report and map showing the extent of current disturbances to affected land, reclamation accomplished to date and during the preceding year, new disturbances that are anticipated to occur during the upcoming year, reclamation that will be performed during the coming year, the dates for the beginning of active operations, and the date active operations ceased for the year, if any.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (3), an operator who has filed an application pursuant to this article shall submit the annual fee specified in section 34-32.5-125 in addition to the map and plan. Where an operator is late in payment of the annual fee by greater than sixty days, the office shall set the matter for a hearing before the board for permit revocation and forfeiture of the financial warranty.

Reclamation plans and their implementation are required on all affected lands and shall conform to the following requirements:

Grading shall be carried on so as to create a final topography appropriate to the final post-extraction land use selected in accordance with paragraph (m) of this subsection (4).

If earth dams are constructed to impound water, the formation of such impoundments will not damage adjoining property or conflict with water pollution laws, rules, or regulations of the federal government or the state of Colorado or with any local government pollution ordinances.

An operator shall demonstrate that all mined material disposed of within the affected area and all affected areas to be reclaimed as part of the approved application will not result in any unauthorized release of pollutants to the surface drainage system.

No unauthorized release of pollutants to groundwater shall occur from any materials mined, handled, or disposed of within the permit area.

All refuse shall be disposed of in a manner that controls unsightliness or the deleterious effects of such refuse.

In those areas where revegetation is part of the reclamation plan, land shall be revegetated so that a diverse, effective, and long-lasting vegetative cover is established that is capable of self-regeneration and is at least equal, with respect to the extent of cover, to the natural vegetation of the surrounding area. Species chosen for revegetation shall be compatible for the proposed post-extraction land use and shall be of adequate diversity to establish successful reclamation.

Where it is necessary to remove overburden to mine the construction material, topsoil shall be removed and segregated from other spoil. If such topsoil is not replaced on a backfill area within a period of time short enough to avoid deterioration of the topsoil, vegetative cover or other means shall be employed so that such topsoil is preserved from wind and water erosion, remains free of contamination, and is in a useable condition for sustaining vegetation when restored during reclamation. If, in the discretion of the board, such topsoil is of insufficient quantity or of poor quality for sustaining vegetation or if other strata can be shown to be more suitable for vegetation requirements, the operator shall remove, segregate, and preserve in a like manner such other strata which are best able to support vegetation.

Disturbances to the prevailing hydrologic balance of the affected land and of the surrounding area and to the quality and quantity of water in surface and groundwater systems, both during and after the mining operation and during reclamation, shall be minimized. Nothing in this paragraph (h) shall be construed to allow the operator to avoid compliance with other statutory provisions governing well permits and augmentation requirements and replacement plans when applicable.

Areas outside of the affected land shall be protected from slides or damage occurring during the mining operation and reclamation.

All surface areas of the affected land, including spoil piles, shall be stabilized and protected so as to effectively control erosion.

All affected areas to be seeded or to receive transplants shall be seeded or transplanted using reclamation practices and techniques acceptable to the office. Planting methods include seedbed and seed preparation and soil amendments appropriate to the topography, physical and chemical characteristics of soil, and selected plant species adequate to give the best chance for successful reclamation.

The operator may permit the public to use lands it owns for recreational purposes in accordance with the limited landowner liability law contained in article 41 of title 33, C.R.S., except in areas where such use is found by the operator to be hazardous or objectionable.

With respect to all affected land, the operator, in consultation with the landowner where possible subject to the approval of the board, shall determine which parts of the affected land shall be reclaimed for forest, range, crop, horticultural, homesite, recreational, industrial, or other uses, including food, shelter, and ground cover for wildlife. Before approving a new reclamation plan or a change in an existing reclamation plan, the board may confer with the local board of county commissioners and the board of supervisors of the conservation district if the mining operation is within the boundaries of a conservation district.

If the operator's choice of reclamation is for range, the affected land shall be restored to slopes commensurate with the proposed land use that shall not be too steep to be traversed by livestock. No grazing shall be permitted on reclaimed land until the planting is firmly established. The board, in consultation with the landowner and the local conservation district, if any, shall determine when grazing may start.

If the operator's choice of reclamation is for agricultural or horticultural crops that normally require the use of farm equipment, the operator shall grade the affected land so the area can be traversed with farm machinery. Preparation for seeding or planting, fertilization, and seeding or planting rates shall be governed by general agricultural and horticultural practices except where research or experience in such operations differs with such practices.

If the operator's choice of reclamation is for the development of the affected land for homesite, recreational, industrial, or other uses, including food, shelter, and ground cover for wildlife, the minimum requirements necessary for such reclamation shall be agreed upon between the operator and the board.

All reclamation requirements required by this section shall be carried to completion with reasonable diligence and conducted concurrently with mining operations to the extent practicable, taking into consideration the mining plan, safety, economics, the availability of equipment and material, and other site-specific conditions relevant and unique to the affected land and the postmining land use. Upon completion of each phase of mining and, in accordance with the reclamation plan, final reclamation of each mining phase shall be completed prior to the expiration of five years after the date the operator advises the board in an annual report that such phase of mining has been completed, unless such period is extended by the board pursuant to section 34-32.5-112; except that reclamation may be completed in phases and the five-year period may be applied separately to each phase as it commences during the life of the mine.

No planting shall be required on affected land:

Used or proposed to be used by the operator for the deposit or disposal of refuse until after the cessation of operations productive of such refuse or proposed for future mining operations;

Within depressed haulage roads or final cuts while such roads or final cuts are being used or made; or

Where permanent pools or lakes have been formed.

No planting of any kind shall be required on affected land so long as the chemical and physical characteristics of the surface and immediately underlying material of such affected land are chemically incompatible with plant growth, deficient in plant nutrients, or composed of sand, gravel, shale, or stone to such an extent as to seriously inhibit plant growth and such condition cannot feasibly be remedied by chemical treatment, fertilization, replacement of overburden, or like measures. When natural weathering and leaching of any of such affected land, over a period of five years after commencement of reclamation, fails to remove the chemical and physical characteristics inhibitory to plant growth or if, at any time within such five-year period, the board determines that any of such affected land is, and during the remainder of said five-year period will be, unplantable, the operator's obligations under the provisions of this article with respect to such affected land may, with the approval of the board, be discharged by reclamation of an equal number of acres of land previously mined and owned by the operator and not otherwise subject to reclamation under this article.

With the approval of the board and the owner of the land to be reclaimed, an operator may substitute land previously mined and owned by the operator that is not otherwise subject to reclamation under this article or, in the alternative, with the approval of the board and the owner of the land, reclamation of an equal number of acres of any lands previously excavated or mined but not owned by the operator if the operator has not previously abandoned unreclaimed land affected by mining operations. As an alternative, the board may grant the reclamation of lesser or greater acreage if the cost of reclaiming such acreage is at least equivalent to the cost of reclaiming the original permit lands. If an area is so substituted, the operator shall submit a map of the substituted area conforming to all map requirements in this article. Upon completion of reclamation of the substituted land, the operator shall be relieved of all obligations under this article with respect to the land for which substitution has been permitted.

A building, or a structure placed on affected land during extraction operations, may remain on the affected land at the option of the operator with the approval of the landowner and the board if such building or structure conforms to local building and zoning codes and is compatible with the postmining land use.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1174, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3) amended, p. 180, § 6, effective April 18.

L. 2002:

(4)(m) and (4)(n) amended, p. 518, § 16, effective July 1.

34-32.5-117. Warranties of performance - warranties of financial responsibility - release of warranties.

A permit shall not be issued under this article until the board receives the performance and financial warranties described in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section.

A "performance warranty" is a written promise made by the operator to the board to comply with this article and shall be in such form as the board may prescribe. Whenever two or more persons or entities are named as operators in a single permit, such operators may limit the scope of their individual performance warranties if such warranties, in the aggregate, warrant the performance of all requirements of this article.

A "financial warranty" is a written promise a party makes to the board to be responsible for reclamation costs, up to the amount specified in subsection (4) of this section, and includes proof of financial responsibility. A financial warranty shall be in such form as the board may prescribe and may be provided by the operator, by a third party, or by any combination of persons or entities.

The board may accept interests in real and personal property as financial warranties to the extent of a specified percentage of the estimated value of such property. A person offering such a financial warranty shall submit information to show clear title to and the value of such property.

The board may refuse to accept a financial warranty if:

The value of such warranty is dependent upon the success, profitability, or continued operation of the mine; or

It determines that such warranty cannot reasonably be converted to cash within one hundred eighty days of forfeiture.

For construction materials operations:

This subsection (3) shall apply on July 1, 1993, to a deed of trust used as collateral for a new financial warranty completed on or after such date;

This subsection (3) shall be effective on January 1, 1996, with respect to a:

Financial warranty that is collateral for a deed of trust used as collateral for a financial warranty in existence on July 1, 1993, and subsequent amendments of such deed of trust; and

Financial warranty completed before July 1, 1993, if the value of such financial warranty includes a construction material value or if construction material value is used to update such warranty. The value of a financial warranty described in this sub-subparagraph (B) shall include the construction material value for the life of the warranty.

An instrument offered as a financial warranty pursuant to this subsection (3) shall provide that the board may recover any necessary costs it incurs, including attorney fees, in foreclosing on or realizing collateral used to secure such financial warranty in the event of forfeiture.

Proof of financial responsibility may consist of one or more of the following, subject to approval by the board:

A surety bond issued by a corporate surety authorized to do business in this state;

A letter of credit issued by a bank authorized to do business in the United States;

A certificate of deposit;

A deed of trust or security agreement encumbering real or personal property and creating a first lien in favor of this state;

Assurance, in such form as the board may require, that:

Upon commencement of production, the operator will establish an individual reclamation fund to be held by an independent trustee for the board, upon such terms and conditions as the board may prescribe, and funded by periodic cash payments representing such fraction of receipts as will, in the opinion of the board, provide assurance that funds will be available for reclamation;

Prior to the issuance of a permit, the operator will provide another form of financial warranty as described in this paragraph (f). As the reclamation fund increases in value, the other form of financial warranty may be decreased in value so long as the sum of financial warranties is the amount specified in subsection (4) of this section.

Project-related fixtures and equipment, excluding rolling stock, owned or to be owned by the financial warrantor within the permit area will have a salvage value at least equal to the amount of the financial warranty or the appropriate portion of such warranty;

Existing liens and encumbrances applicable to project-related fixtures and equipment shall be subordinated to the lien described in section 34-32.5-118; except that liens in favor of the United States, a state, or a political subdivision shall not be so subordinated;

Project-related fixtures and equipment shall be maintained in good operating condition and will not be removed from the permit area without the prior consent of the board;

A certified financial statement for the financial warrantor's most recent fiscal year and a certification by an independent auditor that:

The financial warrantor is the issuer of one or more currently outstanding senior credit obligations that have been rated by a nationally recognized rating organization;

The obligations enjoy a rating by such rating organization of 'A' or better;

The financial warrantor's net worth was at least twice the amount of all financial warranties made by such warrantor as of the close of the most recent fiscal year;

A certified financial statement for the financial warrantor's most recent fiscal year and a certification by an independent auditor that as of the close of such year the financial warrantor's:

Net worth was at least ten million dollars and was equal to or greater than twice the amount of all financial warranties;

Tangible fixed assets in the United States were worth at least twenty million dollars;

Total liabilities-to-net-worth ratio was not more than two to one;

Net income, excluding nonrecurring items, was positive. Nonrecurring items that affect net income shall be stated in order to determine if they materially affect self-bonding capacity.

Proof that the operator is a department or division of state government or a unit of county or municipal government.

Proof of financial responsibility submitted or revised on or after July 1, 1993, shall be in compliance with subsection (4) of this section.

The board shall prescribe the amount and duration of financial warranties, taking into account the nature, extent, and duration of the proposed mining operation and the magnitude, type, and estimated cost of planned reclamation.

In a single year during the life of a permit the amount of required financial warranties shall not exceed the estimated cost of fully reclaiming all lands to be affected in such year plus all lands affected in previous permit years and not yet fully reclaimed. For purposes of this paragraph (b), reclamation costs shall be computed with reference to current reclamation costs. A financial warranty shall be sufficient to assure the completion of reclamation of affected lands if, because of forfeiture, the office has to complete such reclamation and shall include an additional amount equal to five percent of the amount of the financial warranty to defray administrative costs incurred by the office in conducting the reclamation.

The office and the board shall take reasonable measures to assure the continued adequacy of a financial warranty.

The board may:

From time to time and for good cause shown, increase or decrease the amount and duration of a required financial warranty;

By rule or permit condition, require that proof of value of all or any group of warranties held by the board be submitted on a periodic basis;

By rule or permit condition, limit certain types of warranties to specific purposes or require that a specified percentage of the total bond be held in easily valued and convertible instruments.

A financial warrantor shall have sixty days after the date of notice of an adjustment to fulfill the new requirements.

An operator may file a written notice of completion with the office whenever such operator believes that any or all requirements of this article have been completed with respect to any or all of such operator's affected lands. Within sixty days after receiving such notice, or as soon as weather conditions permit, the office shall inspect affected lands and the reclamation described in the notice to determine if the operator has complied with all applicable requirements.

If the board or office finds that an operator has successfully complied with any or all requirements of this article, it shall release all performance and financial warranties applicable to such requirements. Releases shall be in writing and delivered promptly to the owner or operator after the date of such finding.

If the board or office finds that an operator has not complied with applicable requirements of this article, it shall advise the operator of such noncompliance not more than sixty days after the date of the inspection.

If the office fails to conduct an inspection within the time specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) or to advise the operator of deficiencies within the time specified in paragraph (c) of this subsection (5), then all financial warranties applicable to the reclamation described in the notice shall be deemed released as a matter of law.

A financial warranty shall be maintained in good standing for the entire life of a permit issued under this article. A financial warrantor shall immediately notify the board of an event that may impair its warranty.

Each financial warrantor who provides proof of financial responsibility in a form described in subsection (3)(f)(IV) to (3)(f)(VII) or subsection (8) of this section shall cause to be filed with the board a certification by an independent auditor. Such certification shall be filed annually and shall provide that, as of the close of the financial warrantor's most recent fiscal year, such financial warrantor continued to meet all applicable requirements of such subparagraphs (IV) to (VII). A financial warrantor who no longer meets such requirements shall cause to be filed an alternate form of financial warranty.

A financial warrantor who provides proof of financial responsibility in a form described in paragraph (b) of this subsection (6) shall notify the board within sixty days after a net loss is incurred in a quarterly period.

Whenever the board receives a notice under paragraph (a) or (c) of this subsection (6), fails to receive a certification or substitute warranty as required by paragraph (b) of this subsection (6), or otherwise has reason to believe that a financial warranty has been materially impaired, it may convene a hearing for the purpose of determining whether impairment has in fact occurred.

Whenever the board convenes a hearing pursuant to this subsection (6), it may hire an independent consultant to provide expert advice at the hearing. The fees of any such consultant shall be paid by the financial warrantor, and no consultant shall be hired until the financial warrantor signs a written fee agreement in such form as the board may prescribe. If a financial warrantor refuses to sign such an agreement, the board may, without hearing, order such financial warrantor to provide an alternate form of financial warranty.

If the board finds, at any hearing held pursuant to this subsection (6), that a financial warranty has been materially impaired, it may order the financial warrantor to provide an alternate form of financial warranty.

A financial warrantor shall have ninety days to provide any alternate warranty required under this subsection (6).

All hearings held under this subsection (6) shall comply with the requirements of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

For purposes of this section, a "Rating of 'A' or better" means that a nationally recognized rating organization has determined that the obligations are at least of an upper-medium grade. This means that the factors giving security to the principal and interest are considered to be adequate but elements may be present that suggest the possibility of adverse effects if economic and trade conditions change.

The board or office may accept a first-priority lien on project-related fixtures and equipment that must remain on site for the reclamation plan to be performed in lieu of including the cost of acquiring and installing such fixtures and equipment in the amount of the financial warranty prescribed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

The board or office may accept a first-priority lien on project-related fixtures and equipment that must be demolished or removed from the site under a reclamation plan and may, in its discretion, accept such a lien as a portion of the proof of financial responsibility if the amount credited does not exceed the cost of demolishing and removing such fixtures and equipment or the market value of such fixtures and equipment, whichever is less.

Any fixtures and equipment accepted pursuant to this subsection (8) shall be insured and maintained in good operating condition and shall not be removed from the permit area without the prior consent of the board. A financial warrantor that provides a lien on such equipment and fixtures shall file an annual report with the office in sufficient detail to fully describe the condition, value, and location of all pledged fixtures and equipment. Such financial warrantor shall not pledge such equipment and fixtures to secure any other obligation and shall immediately notify the office of any other interest that arises in the pledged property.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire article added, p. 1178, § 1, effective July 1.